Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-815
Authority; officers; executive director; compensation; receive
contributions.

Each year the authority shall
elect one of its members as chairperson and another member as vice-chairperson.
It may appoint an executive director and assistant executive director, who
shall not be members of the authority but who shall serve at the pleasure
of the authority. An assistant executive director shall perform the duties
of the executive director in the event of the absence or inability to act
of the executive director. They shall receive such compensation as shall be
fixed by the authority. The authority may receive contributions to fund any
of the expenses of the authority from private donors, including any one or
more of the eligible institutions or any one or more associations representing
the eligible institutions.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2912;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1712;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 15.